Washington statutes.
RCW 10.27.010

Short title—Purpose.

This chapter shall be known as the criminal investigatory act of 1971 and is enacted on behalf of the people of the state of Washington to serve law enforcement in combating crime and corruption.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 67 s 1.]